Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.461

Washington real estate research account—Creation. (Expires September 30, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1552.SL) ***

(1) The Washington real estate research account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee under RCW 18.85.451 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW 18.85.471.

(2) During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the real estate research account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

(3) This section expires September 30, 2025.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 915; 2015 c 175 s 2; 2010 c 156 s 2; 2008 c 23 s 46; 2005 c 185 s 2; 1999 c 192 s 2. Formerly RCW 18.85.530.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective date—2010 c 156: See note following RCW 18.85.451.